test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/V-lex_lede_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - leđe: # MLO, checked, check also Imprt and ConNeg
    leđe+V+Inf: leđe
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lam
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lah
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lii
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: [láán, laan, leen]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: leppee
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: [lává, lava]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lep
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: leppeđ
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [láá, laa]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lijjim
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lijjih
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [lâi, lei]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [láim, lááim]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [láid, lááid]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [láin, lááin, lein]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [lâim, leim]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [lâid, leid]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lijjii
    leđe+V+Cond+Sg1: liččim
    leđe+V+Cond+Sg2: liččih
    leđe+V+Cond+Sg3: ličij
    leđe+V+Cond+Du1: liččijm
    leđe+V+Cond+Du2: luṿâččáid
    leđe+V+Cond+Du3: luṿâččáin
    leđe+V+Cond+Pl1: luṿâččijm
    leđe+V+Cond+Pl2: luṿâččijd
    leđe+V+Cond+Pl3: luṿâččii
    leđe+V+Pot+Sg1: ležžeem
    leđe+V+Pot+Sg2: ležžeeh
    leđe+V+Pot+Sg3: [leš, lâš, laš]
    leđe+V+Pot+Du1: ležžeen
    leđe+V+Pot+Du2: lešvettee
    leđe+V+Pot+Du3: [ležžev, ležžâv]
    leđe+V+Pot+Pl1: [ležžep, ležžâp]
    leđe+V+Pot+Pl2: lešvetteđ
    leđe+V+Pot+Pl3: ležeh
    leđe+V+Imprt+Sg1: liähum
    leđe+V+Imprt+Sg2: oro
    leđe+V+Imprt+Sg3: [liäˊṿus, liävus, liävvus, liävˊvus, lávus, liäkˊkus]
    leđe+V+Imprt+Du1: liähoon
    leđe+V+Imprt+Du2: orroo
    leđe+V+Imprt+Du3: liähus
    leđe+V+Imprt+Pl1: liähoop
    leđe+V+Imprt+Pl2: orroođ
    leđe+V+Imprt+Pl3: [liähus, láhhus]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: lah
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: lamaš
    leđe+V+Cond+ConNeg: [liččii, lijjii]
    leđe+V+Pot+ConNeg: ližžii
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Neg: lah
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+ConNe: liččii
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+PotNe: [lâš, leš]
    leđe+V+PrsPrc: leijee
    leđe+V+PrfPrc: [lamaš, lam, lámáš]
    leđe+V+Actio: lem
    leđe+V+Actio+Ess: lemin
    leđe+V+Actio+Loc: lemist
    leđe+V+Actio+Ill: XXX
    leđe+V+Ger: leđedijn
    leđe+V+VAbess: leđehánnáá
